New York, session 2025-2026, A8169.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "R.I.D.E.R
'Rider Interests Deserve Empowering Representation' Act".
§ 2. The section heading and subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 1204-e of
the public authorities law, the section heading as added by chapter 483
of the laws of 1981 and as renumbered by section 2 of part H of chapter
25 of the laws of 2009, subdivisions 1 and 2 as amended by chapter 125
of the laws of 2022, are amended to read as follows:
New York city transit [authority advisory] riders council. 1. There is
hereby created the New York city transit authority advisory riders coun-
cil, to study, investigate, monitor, and make recommendations with
respect to the maintenance and operation of the New York city transit
authority, its subsidiaries, and the Staten Island rapid transit operat-
ing authority. Such council shall study and investigate all aspects of
the day to day operations of such authority, its subsidiaries and the
Staten Island rapid transit operating authority, monitor their perform-
ance and recommend changes to improve the efficiency of the operation
thereof. Such council shall study and make recommendations in regard to
improving bicycle and pedestrian access on trains and buses, and at
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD11632-06-6

A. 8169--A 2
bridges, stations and other facilities operated by the authority, its
affiliates and subsidiaries and the Staten Island rapid transit operat-
ing authority and submit such recommendations to the metropolitan trans-
portation authority on or before June first, two thousand twenty-two and
every five years thereafter.
2. Such council shall consist of sixteen members who shall be commu-
ters who regularly use the transportation services of such authorities.
Of the sixteen members, at least one member shall be a resident of Bronx
county, at least one member shall be a resident of Kings county, at
least one member shall be a resident of New York county, at least one
member shall be a resident of Richmond county, and at least one member
shall be a resident of Queens county. Six of such sixteen members shall
be appointed by the governor upon the recommendation of the mayor of the
city of New York[;], five upon the recommendation of the public advocate
of the [city council of the] city of New York[;], and five [other
members appointed upon the recommendation one by each of the borough
presidents of the boroughs of the city of New York.] upon the recommen-
dation of local elected officials in consultation with the borough pres-
ident of such borough of the city of New York where the member resides.
Provided, however, that one member recommended by the mayor of New York
shall have a demonstrated expertise or interest in the promotion and
development of improved bicycle and pedestrian access at bridges,
stations and other facilities operated by the metropolitan transporta-
tion authority, as created by section twelve hundred sixty-three of this
article, and such authority's affiliates and subsidiaries. The [chair-
man] chairperson shall be a member selected by the membership of the
committee. Each of the members shall serve for a term of two years[,
provided, however, that of the first appointments, two appointed upon
the recommendation of the mayor and two appointed upon the recommenda-
tion of the president of the city council shall serve for a term of one
year]. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of term shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointments for the balance
of the unexpired term but shall be subject to the provisions of subdivi-
sion five of section twelve hundred sixty-six-i of this article.
§ 3. The section heading and subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 1266-d of
the public authorities law, the section heading as added by chapter 482
of the laws of 1981, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 125 of the laws
of 2022, and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 802 of the laws of
2021, are amended to read as follows:
Long Island rail road [commuter's] commuter council. 1. There is here-
by created the Long Island rail road [commuter's] commuter council, to
study, investigate, monitor and make recommendations with respect to the
maintenance and operation of the Long Island rail road. Such council
shall study and investigate all aspects of the day to day operations of
such railroad, monitor its performance and recommend changes to improve
the efficiency of the operation thereof. Such council shall study and
make recommendations in regard to improving bicycle and pedestrian
access at bridges, stations and other facilities operated by the Long
Island Railroad and submit such recommendations to the metropolitan
transportation authority on or before June first, two thousand twenty-
two and every five years thereafter.
2. Such council shall consist of thirteen members who shall be commu-
ters who regularly use the transportation services of such railroad, and
who shall be residents of Nassau, Suffolk, Queens, or [Brooklyn] Kings
county. Members shall be appointed by the governor upon the recommenda-
tion of local elected officials in consultation with the county execu-

A. 8169--A 3
tive of [each such] Nassau or Suffolk county, provided, however, that
such members shall be chosen from a list of ten names submitted by each
such county executive and provided further however that no more than six
members of such council shall be residents of either such county.
Provided, however, that one member shall be appointed on the recommenda-
tion of a local elected official in consultation with the borough presi-
dent of Queens and one member shall be appointed on the recommendation
of a local elected official in consultation with the borough president
of Brooklyn. Provided, however, that one member [shall be], appointed
[who has a] upon the recommendation of a local elected official in
consultation with the county executive or borough president of such
county or borough where the member resides shall have demonstrated
expertise or interest in the promotion and development of improved bicy-
cle and pedestrian access at bridges, stations and other facilities
operated by the authority and its affiliates and subsidiaries. Vacancies
occurring in the membership of the council shall be filled in the same
manner as original appointments, provided, however, that if the appoint-
ment prior to the vacancy was made upon the recommendation of the Nassau
or Suffolk county executive, such vacancy shall be filled from a list of
three names submitted by each such county executive, and provided,
further, that such appointments shall be subject to the provisions of
subdivision five of section twelve hundred sixty-six-i of this title.
§ 4. The section heading and subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 1266-e of
the public authorities law, the section heading as added by chapter 482
of the laws of 1981, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 125 of the laws
of 2022, and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 802 of the laws of
2021, are amended to read as follows:
Metro-North [rail] railroad commuter council. 1. There is hereby
created the Metro-North [rail] railroad commuter council to study,
investigate, monitor and make recommendations with respect to the main-
tenance and operation of those portions of, if any, the Hudson, Harlem,
New Haven, Penn Access, Pascack Valley and Port Jervis commuter railroad
lines remaining within the metropolitan commuter transportation
district. Such council shall study and investigate all aspects of the
day to day operation of such railroad lines, monitor their performance
and recommend changes to improve the efficiency of the operation there-
of. Such council shall study and make recommendations in regard to
improving bicycle and pedestrian access at bridges, stations and other
facilities operated by such railroad lines and submit such recommenda-
tions to the metropolitan transportation authority on or before June
first, two thousand twenty-two and every five years thereafter.
2. Such council shall consist of twelve members and shall be commuters
who regularly use the transportation services of such railroad lines. At
least five of such members shall be residents of the county of Westches-
ter. Of the other seven members, at least one of such members shall be a
resident of each of the counties of Rockland, Putnam, Dutchess, Orange
and Bronx, provided that such county has not withdrawn from the metro-
politan commuter transportation district pursuant to section twelve
hundred seventy-nine-b of this title; provided further, should only the
county of Putnam remain in the metropolitan commuter transportation
district then membership on such council shall consist of eight members,
six of whom reside in the county of Westchester and two of whom reside
in the county of Putnam. Members shall be appointed by the governor. In
making such appointments the governor shall consult with and solicit
recommendations from local officials and to the extent possible appoint
members who represent the ridership of the several commuter railroad

A. 8169--A 4
lines. Provided, however, that one member shall be appointed who has a
demonstrated expertise or interest in the promotion and development of
improved bicycle and pedestrian access at bridges, stations and other
facilities operated by the authority and its affiliates and subsid-
iaries. Vacancies occurring in the membership of the council shall be
filled in the same manner as original appointments but shall be subject
to the provisions of subdivision five of section twelve hundred sixty-
six-i of this title.
§ 5. Section 1266-i of the public authorities law, as added by section
10 of part H of chapter 25 of the laws of 2009, is amended to read as
follows:
§ 1266-i. The permanent citizens advisory committee. 1. There is here-
by established a permanent citizens advisory committee. The members of
the committee shall consist of the following members: the Long Island
Rail Road [commuter's] commuter council, the Metro-North railroad commu-
ter council, and the New York city transit [authority advisory] riders
council, as defined in section twelve hundred four-e of this [chapter]
article.
2. Such committee shall serve as a coordinating council of the Long
Island Rail Road commuter council, the Metro-North railroad commuter
council, and the New York city transit riders council, providing a
regional and balanced perspective to such councils' work. Such committee
shall be a source of advice to the authority and its subsidiaries and
affiliates regarding matters of finance, operations, management, plan-
ning, service issues, and the capital program plans established in
section twelve hundred sixty-nine-b of this title as well as any other
capital plans of such authority. Such committee shall have the same
access to information of the authority and its subsidiaries and affil-
iates as the Long Island Rail Road commuter council, the Metro-North
railroad commuter council, and the New York city transit riders council.
3. The metropolitan transportation authority and its applicable
constituent agencies shall prepare a response to requests for informa-
tion related to such committee's work made by the Long Island Rail Road
commuter council, the Metro-North railroad commuter council, and the New
York city transit riders council within thirty days of receipt of such
request.
4. The members of the Long Island Rail Road commuter council, the
Metro-North railroad commuter council, and the New York city transit
riders council shall receive no compensation for their services but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
5. Appointments to the Long Island Rail Road commuter council, the
Metro-North railroad commuter council, and the New York city transit
riders council shall be made as prescribed in section twelve hundred
sixty-six-d, twelve hundred sixty-six-e, or twelve hundred four-e of
this article, respectively, except that if recommendations for members
have not been made by an elected official endowed with the power to make
such recommendation in such respective sections within ninety days of a
vacancy on the Long Island Rail Road commuter council, the Metro-North
railroad commuter council, or the New York city transit riders council,
interim appointments may be made upon the recommendation of the execu-
tive committee and staff of the permanent citizens advisory committee
for the balance of the unexpired term. Notice of such interim appoint-
ments described herein shall be included in the official meeting minutes
of the permanent citizens advisory committee.

A. 8169--A 5
6. The committee shall also have employees who do not serve on the
commuters and riders councils described in this section, but who are
employed by the authority to serve the committee. The authority shall
provide appropriate funding for such employees who are selected by and
dedicated to the committee, and shall not withhold, withdraw, reduce, or
take any other action which threatens or appears to threaten funding for
such employees due to the committee and its employees taking editorial,
governance, and/or public policy positions which differ from those of
the authority.
7. The authority shall provide adequate resources and other assistance
to the permanent citizens advisory committee, including any assistance
and provision of data as will enable it to properly carry out its activ-
ities and operations under any provision of this chapter.
8. Any intellectual property created or originated by the permanent
citizens advisory committee shall be the sole and exclusive property of
such committee.
9. The permanent citizens advisory committee and the authority may
enter into agreements with each other to facilitate the provisions of
this section.
§ 6. This act shall take effect immediately.